Utah statutes.
56-1-12.   Injury to livestock -- Notice.

Every person operating a railroad within this state that injures or kills any livestock of any description by the running of any engine or engines, car or cars, over or against any such livestock shall within three days thereafter post at the first railroad station in each direction from the place of such injury or killing in some conspicuous place on the outside of such station a notice in writing of the number and kind of animals so injured or killed, with a full description of each, and the time and place as near as may be of such injury or killing. Such notice shall be dated and signed by some officer or agent of such railroad, and a duplicate thereof shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which stock is so injured or killed. Every person willfully failing, neglecting or refusing to comply with the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined in any sum not exceeding $50.

